District of Columbia statutes.
26-1209

Rules.

The Superintendent [Commissioner] shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day review period, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect the requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Oct. 12, 1988, D.C. Law 7-175, § 10, 35 DCR 6133

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-909.